Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
603

CIRCUIT
COURTS

Part I. Circuits and Judges

Section

603-1 Judicial circuits

603-2 Title

603-3 First circuit court judges

603-4 Other circuits; judges

603-5 Salary of circuit court judges

603-6 Residence of judge

603-7 Repealed

Part II. Sessions

603-11 Separate sessions at same time

603-12 Sessions, held where

603-13 Repealed

603-14 Place of trial; signature of judge

603-15 Repealed

603-16 Continuance of hearing or trial

603-17 Repealed

Part III. Jurisdiction and Powers

603-21 Repealed

603-21.5 General

603-21.6 Probate

603-21.7 Nonjury cases

603-21.8 Appeals

603-21.9 Powers

603-22 Repealed

603-23 Injunction of violation of laws and
ordinances

603-23.5 Action to enjoin violation of section
708-871;

action for damages

603-24 to 28 Repealed

603-29 Order to show cause

Part IV. Venue

603-36 Actions and proceedings, where to be
brought

603-37 Change of venue

603-37.5 Cure or waiver of defects

Part V. Assignment to Another Circuit;
Temporary

Assignment of Retired Circuit
Judges

603-41 When judge may be required to preside in
another

circuit; temporary assignment of retired
circuit

judges

603-42 Repealed

Part VI. Rent Control Appeals--Repealed

603-46 Repealed

Note

As to procedural statutes superseded by the rules of the
court, see note preceding Title 32.

Cross References

Intermediate sanctions for selected offenders and defendants,
see §§353-10.5, 353-63.5, and 706-605.1.

Rules of Court

See generally Hawaii Rules of Civil Procedure; Hawaii Rules
of Penal Procedure; Hawaii Court Records Rules; Hawaii Electronic Filing and
Service Rules.

Law Journals and Reviews

Settling Civil Lawsuits in the Hawaii Circuit Courts. 10 HBJ,
no. 13, at 1 (2007).

Electronic Discovery: A Call for a New Rules Regime for the Hawai‘i
Courts. 32 UH L. Rev. 153 (2009).

Report on the Success of the Maui/Molokai Adult
Drug Court: Proven Successful, the New Paradigm for our Criminal Justice System?
34 UH L. Rev. 423 (2012).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next